Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nippondenso To Manufacture Auto Parts in 
Mexico; Mitsubishi Group, Reynolds To Market Aluminum Auto Parts in 
Japan 

   Economic Trends - Economic Council To Take Up Foreign Trade 
Policy Issues; Japan's Overseas Direct Investment Up 5.5 Percent in 
FY93 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Banks Begin Netting Operations With 
Foreign Banks; Foreign Securities Firms To Underwrite Government- 
Backed Bonds; 
   Foreign Trade and Investment - CENTRAL ASIAN REPUBLICS:  Central 
Asian Economic Committees Launched 

   CHINA:  Omron To Set Up Cash Register Production Joint Venture; 
Toray To Build Polyester Production Base in Jiangsu; Taoka Chemical 
Forms Synthetic Dye Joint Venture in Tianjin; KDK To Establish 
Electrode Foil Production Operations in Guangdong 

   VIETNAM:  Itochu-Isuzu Joint Venture To Assemble Small Trucks; 
Construction Companies Open Offices in Hanoi 

   Glass Industry - MITI Denies Report of Tariff Cuts, Prepares for 
Glass Talks; Asahi Glass To Raise Price of Sheet Glass Despite Weak 
Demand 

   Nonferrous Metals - Showa Denko To Withdraw From Titanium 
Refining, Sales 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Survey Shows Shareholding 
Effective in Reforming Enterprise; Article Examines Obstacles To 
Developing Machine-Building Industry; Bleak Outlook for Textile 
Exports in 1994; Pudong Plans 100,000-Ton Shipyard 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Singapore Investing in 
International Facilities for Yantai City; First Yen-Denominated 
Floating Rate Notes Issued; Thai Group to Build Industrial Park in 
Henan's Luohe; Guangdong Trade Delegates Hold Trade Talks in Paris; 
Fujian Signs Contracts for Nine Foreign Projects; Quanzhou, Fujian 
Attracts $1 Billion of Foreign Investment; Fujian's Sanduao Attracts 
Foreign Investment; Shantou Cooperates With Singapore in Building 
Rolling Mill; Pudong Processing Zone Attracts High-Tech 
Multinational Corporations; Dalian Seeks 2 Billion Yuan for Dalian- 
Yantai Railway Ferry; Jiangxi Sets Up Investment Zone for Taiwan 
Businesses; Yunnan Seeks Foreign Partners To Build Kunming-Bangkok 
Railway; Xinjiang Airlines To Open International Routes; Hong Kong's 
CITIC Real Estate Investment in Fuzhou; Hong Kong Company Involved 
in Fujian Infrastructure Development; Some 100,000 Hong Kong Firms 
Said Operating in Mainland China; Hong Kong's Shougang Concord 
Acquires 51 Percent of Hebei Plate Mill; Hong Kong Economic 
Interaction With Mainland Viewed 

   Taiwan:  Restrictions on Fruit Imports Lifted, Tariffs Cut; 
Exports Up 1.5 Percent, Imports 2.2 Percent in Second Quarter; 
Market Share of Imported Light Industry Products Exceeds 50 Percent; 
Government To Increase Incentives for Selected Overseas Investments; 
State Enterprises May Register Patent Rights in PRC; Economic Growth 
Expected to Fall Short of 1994 Target 

   NORTH KOREA:  Government Official Discusses Plans To Boost 
Foreign Trade 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Coal Companies, Conglomerates Eye Korea 
Gas Privatization; FEATURE:  'Non-Official' Groups Plan New 
Corporate State Relationship; FEATURE:  Hyundai Developing Rocket 
With Russian Technology; FEATURE:  Samsung Introduces Third- 
Generation Electric Car; Iljin Advertisement Touts Group's 
Technological 'Achievements'; ROK Government To Subsidize 
Engineering Technology; Daewoo Producing High-Tech Carbon Material 
for Aerospace; Brazing Furnace, Other 'Dual-Use' Products 
Indigenized; ROK To Increase LNG Carrier Fleet to 10 Vessels by 
2006; Halla Group, U.S. Firm To Build LNG Base in South Cholla; 
Patent Office To Promote Environmental Technologies; Patent Office 
To Set up New Offices Promoting Inventions, Patents; Taerim Receives 
Order for Gas Processing Facilities From India; POSCO Takes Over 
Japanese Steel Materials Plant; Hyundai Begins Pipeline Project in 
Vietnam; Development Bank Offers Loan to China To Build Thermal 
Power Plant; Gold Star Electric Cable Exports Combines to China; 
Samsung To Participate in Russian Telecommunications Projects 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Coal Production Figures, Volume of 
Deposits Reported 

   MALAYSIA:  Leader Universal Holdings Begins PRC Joint Venture; 
Bank Consortium To Fund $1.2-Billion Sarawak LNG Project; 
Electricity Corporation Awards Contract to PRC Group 

   PHILIPPINES:  Manila To Get Telecommunications Tower 

   THAILAND:  Japanese Firm Wins Natural Gas Separator Construction 
Contract; ROK, Japanese Firms To Build Steel Plant in Thailand; 
Japanese Firm Approved for Vehicle-Part Production 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investors Conferences, Foreign Investment 
Policies Reported; Premier Issues Directive To Raise Revenues, 
Balance Budget; Thanh Hoa, Taiwanese Companies Form Joint Venture; 
Japanese Banks Trailing Others in Vietnam Investment; Mitsui 
Importing LPG, Ammonia to Vietnam; Australian, U.S. Firms Plan Power 
Plant-Factory Complex; Joint Venture Firm Plans To Install 200,000 
Telephone Circuits; Northern Telecom To Provide Telephone Equipment; 
Export-Import Value Rises to $3.3 Billion; Authorities Withdraw 131 
Investment Licenses; Construction Boom Keeps Demand, Price of Cement 
High; Hanoi Issues New Treasury Bills, Bonds 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-12) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nippondenso To Manufacture Auto Parts in 
Mexico -- Nippondenso Co., a major auto parts manufacturer 
affiliated with Toyota Motor Corp., is looking to produce automobile 
parts in Mexico by 1998 and is currently organizing a survey team to 
determine the timing and location for such a move and what parts to 
produce.  With the passage of NAFTA, a number of Japanese automakers 
and auto parts makers are taking steps to develop operations in 
Mexico.  Nippondenso, however, is not responding to Japanese firms, 
but to specific requests made by the U.S. "Big Three" automakers. 
Consequently, Nippondenso's decision to move beyond the confines of 
its keiretsu affiliation will likely influence other Japanese parts 
makers. 

   Nippondenso sold over 80 billion yen ($762 million) in parts, 
which includes exports from Japan, to U.S. automakers in FY93. 
Chrysler Corp., the largest single purchaser, "strongly requested" 
that Nippondenso set up operations in Mexico.  General Motors and 
Ford Motor also made requests to the company, since they are 
expanding auto production in Mexico and would like to use parts made 
locally.  Nippondenso currently has seven production bases in the 
United States, but none supply parts to Mexico. 

   Once established in Mexico, Nippondenso also expects to sell 
parts to Japanese automakers, including Nissan Motor Co., which has 
been assembling cars in Mexico since 1966.  Honda Motor Co. recently 
announced its intention to produce autos in Mexico by the end of 
1995.  Toyota is also "investigating" whether to begin assembly 
operations there.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 12) 

   Mitsubishi Group, Reynolds To Market Aluminum Auto Parts in Japan 
-- Mitsubishi Aluminum Co., Mitsubishi Materials Corp., Mitsubishi 
Corp., and U.S. aluminum maker Reynolds Metals have established an 
aluminum auto parts sales company in Japan.  The new company, M.R. 
Auto Products, is capitalized at 10 million yen ($95,250), of which 
Reynolds contributed 30 percent, Mitsubishi Aluminum 50 percent, and 
Mitsubishi Materials and Mitsubishi Corp. 10 percent each. It will 
be responsible for selling to Japanese automakers pressed aluminum 
parts developed by Mitsubishi Aluminum and Reynolds to meet the 
growing demand for lighter auto parts.  The company will market 
mostly imported parts made by Reynolds, but the joint venture is 
considering coproduction of more advanced materials such as 
automobile "space-frames. 

   The Mitsubishi Group and Reynolds reached an agreement in March 
1992 to conduct joint research into pressed aluminum parts with an 
emphasis on lowering automobile weight.  In December 1992 they 
signed a general contract and have been exchanging technicians ever 
since. 

   Due to "rising environmental restrictions," demand for 
lightweight auto parts is increasing.  Consequently, a number of 
international joint ventures have been formed to capitalize on this 
trend.  In June 1992, Kobe Steel and Alcoa Corp. established 50/50 
joint venture subsidiaries in both Japan and the United States.  In 
May 1993, Furukawa Electric Co., the U.S. firm Kaiser, and Itochu 
Corp. set up a joint venture sales firm to sell Kaiser's forged 
products in Japan.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 11) 

   Economic Trends - Economic Council To Take Up Foreign Trade 
Policy Issues -- The Economic Council, an advisory organ to the 
prime minister which has previously focused on domestic economic 
issues, for the first time in July will begin discussions on foreign 
trade policy issues concerning the United States and Europe. 
According to the Economic Planning Agency, which serves as the 
council's secretariat, the council will study the process of U.S. 
antidumping actions because of the many trade issues associated with 
such actions.  In addition, the council will examine the tendency of 
the United States to file antidumping charges "without much thought" 
and will pinpoint problems related to antidumping determinations 
made by the U.S. Government.  It will then make recommendations to 
the Japanese Government on how to approach the U.S. Government with 
requests to change its system and practices.  The council will also 
critically examine European issues related to tariffs and the low 
labor costs of the poorer countries in Europe.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 29 May 94 p 3) 

   Japan's Overseas Direct Investment Up 5.5 Percent in FY93 -- On 3 
June the Ministry of Finance (MOF) announced that Japan's overseas 
direct investment in FY93 amounted to approximately $36 billion, a 
5.5 percent increase from FY92, according to the 4 June NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  This was the first increase in investment since 
FY89, when Japan recorded its highest level of investment, $67.5 
billion.  The MOF attributed the increase to the trend of Japanese 
manufacturers shifting production bases to Asia because of the 
appreciation of the yen.  The MOF's International Finance Bureau 
expects this tendency to continue in the future, because production 
costs in Japan are expected to continue rising. 

   NIKKEI broke down Japan's overseas direct investment by region as 
follows: 

Asia--Total direct investment in Asia amounted to $6.6 billion, a 
3.3 percent increase.  Of that total, investment in China and Hong 
Kong increased 58 percent and 68.4 percent, respectively.  Japanese 
manufacturers invested a total of $1.64 billion in China and Hong 
Kong, 2.2 times the amount invested in FY92.  Direct investment in 
Thailand and Indonesia decreased. 

North America--Investment in North America amounted to $15.3 
billion, a 4.9 percent increase.  By country, investment in the 
United States increased 6.6 percent to $14.7 billion, while 
investment in Canada decreased 25.4 percent to $562 million. 
According to the MOF, this slow growth tendency will probably 
continue, since Japanese companies are planning no additional large- 
scale investment in North America, even though the U.S. economy is 
recovering. 

Europe--Investment in Europe amounted to $7.9 billion, a 12.4 
percent increase.  This was primarily due to the large increase in 
investment by financial and insurance companies. 

   NIKKEI also gave an industry-by-industry breakdown of Japan's 
overseas direct investment.  Investment by the manufacturing 
industry increased 10.7 percent to $11.1 billion.  Within the 
manufacturing industry, while the food processing and electrical 
machinery industries greatly increased their overseas direct 
investment, the chemical and transportation machinery industries 
reduced theirs.  Investment by the nonmanufacturing industry 
amounted to $24.6 billion, a 3.8 percent increase.  Within the 
service sector, the financial and insurance industries increased 
their direct investment "by a large margin" in order to reorganize 
their overseas bases and support their foreign subsidiaries. 
Investment by other service industries, however, decreased by 45.7 
percent, due primarily to a lack of funds. 

   The NIKKEI article also reported that foreign direct investment 
in Japan decreased by 24.6 percent to $3.1 billion.  Reasons for the 
decrease include the relatively high investment costs associated 
with the yen's appreciation and Japan's slow economic recovery.  The 
KYODO NEWS SERVICE on 3 June reported that a large decrease--77.2 
percent--has been noted in foreign investment in the financial and 
insurance industries. 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Banks Begin Netting Operations With 
Foreign Banks -- SUMMARY:  "Netting," the practice of offsetting 
credit and debit balances arising from foreign exchange 
transactions, is taking hold in Japan, according to press reports. 
Several Japanese banks have signed agreements with U.S. banks to 
engage in "bilateral netting," while "multilateral netting" with 
European banks may occur in the future. 

   In December 1993, the Federation of Bankers Associations of Japan 
requested that the Ministry of Finance (MOF) authorize netting, 
arguing that Japanese banks will be unable to compete 
internationally with banks that are allowed to net, according to the 
24 December NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  Netting can improve a bank's 
capital-to-asset ratio because assets can be reduced by offsetting 
them against liabilities while reducing the bank's credit risk, 
according to the 9 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  In this way 
netting makes satisfying Bank for International Settlements capital 
requirements easier.  In addition, a change in U.S. accounting law 
that requires banks to establish formal netting agreements with 
their netting counterparts led U.S. banks to ask the Japanese to 
enter into such agreements, according to the 28 December NIKKEI 
KINYU.  If Japanese banks do not sign up with American banks, the 8 
December NIKKEI KINYU explained, the U.S. banks would give priority 
to doing business with European banks, which are allowed to net. 
This would also contribute to a decline in the competitiveness of 
Japanese banks internationally and Japan's financial markets 
overall, the 24 December NIKKEI KINYU reported.  Thus, the MOF 
authorized Japanese banks to enter into netting agreements on a 
bilateral basis with U.S. banks, according to the 28 December NIKKEI 
KINYU.  The article did not say whether the MOF would authorize 
agreements with European banks as well. 

   Netting Agreements Signed with U.S. Banks -- The Bank of Tokyo 
was the first Japanese bank to sign a netting agreement with a U.S. 
bank when it signed an International Foreign Exchange Masters 
Agreement (IFEMA) with the Tokyo branch of Citibank, according to 
the 9 March NIKKEI KINYU.  This included a comprehensive agreement 
whereby the banks would offset all foreign exchange transactions in 
the event of a default by either party, according to the 9 March 
NIKIEI.  The banks also agreed to calculate the difference on 
foreign currency exchange transactions on a daily basis using the 
FXNET computer system (see below). 

   Mitsubishi Bank signed an IFEMA agreement with Chemical Bank on 
22 March, according to the 23 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The IFEMA with 
Chemical Bank allows it to offset purchases and sales of foreign 
currency on the Tokyo market in the event one of the counterparties 
to a transaction defaults.  The agreement has a broader scope than 
the arrangement between the Bank of Tokyo and Citibank, NIKKEI KlNYU 
observed, in that it applies to foreign exchange transactions at 
Mitsubishi's foreign branches as well. 

   At the end of March, the Industrial Bank of Japan also concluded 
an agreement with Citibank, according to the 14 April NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The 27 May NIKKEI KINYU reported that these three banks are also 
participating in FXNET in London.  FXNET, headquartered in London 
with an office in Japan, is a global computer network conducting 
foreign exchange netting operations that was established by major 
U.S. and European banks.  The article reported that the Bank of 
Tokyo is already engaging in foreign exchange netting with Citibank 
through FXNET in London, while Mitsubishi Bank and the Industrial 
Bank of Japan plan to participate as well.  FXNET has 50 
participating banks worldwide and offers banks-a chance to increase 
efficiency by reducing long-term costs by automating their foreign 
exchange operations, the article reported. 

   Europeans Approach Japanese Banks -- Recently Japanese banks have 
been approached by members of Exchange Clearing House Ltd. (ECHO) to 
participate in a system of "multilateral netting"--simultaneous 
netting conducted through a clearinghouse, rather than directly 
between two banks--that can involve more than two currencies, 
according to the 5 April NIKKEI KINYU.  ECHO, the world's first 
global clearinghouse for foreign exchange established by thirteen 
major European banks and the Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corp., is 
scheduled to begin multilateral netting operations in July 1994. 
Participation in ECHO requires very little additional investment by 
banks, aside from a security deposit, because SWIFT (Society for 
Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunications), the inter-bank 
communication system ECHO employs, is already used globally. 

   Seeing a strong demand for yen in the multilateral netting 
system, ECHO members visited Japan and sounded out the Bank of Tokyo 
and other Japanese banks on whether they wished to participate in 
the clearinghouse system.  They even explained the SWIFT system to 
the MOF and Bank of Japan.  The NIKKEI KINYU article stated that the 
banks are taking a "wait and see" approach to ECHO for several 
reasons.  Multilateral netting is relatively complicated compared to 
bilateral netting and the banks have already started signing 
bilateral netting agreements with U.S. banks.  The article observed 
that European banks hold the lead in this type of netting and hence 
the ambivalent response by the Japanese.  Nevertheless, there will 
be a future need for a global netting system that includes Japanese 
banks. 

   According to the 7 May NIKKEI, Fuji Bank has decided to 
participate in ECHO.  Fuji will make a capital contribution to the 
netting clearinghouse in July 1994 and will begin multilateral 
netting transactions early in 1995.  According to the NIKKEI 
article, Fuji Bank will be the first Japanese bank to settle foreign 
exchange transactions with several foreign banks simultaneously. 

   Foreign Securities Firms To Underwrite Government-Backed Bonds -- 
The Finance Corporation for Local Public Enterprise (Finance Corp.), 
which is overseen by the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of 
Home Affairs, is revising the share of underwriting allotted to 
financial institutions that underwrite public corporation bonds to 
include foreign securities companies, according to the 6 June NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  Public corporation bonds are a type of government- 
backed bond for which payment of interest and principal are 
guaranteed by the government and are second only to government bonds 
in terms of credit risk, according to the 12 May NIKKEI KINYU.  The 
Finance Corp. and the Japan Highway Public Corporation are the 
principal issuers of these bonds.  With the money it raises through 
issuing bonds, the Finance Corp. makes loans to local public 
authorities and corporations, according to the 6 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   According to the 6 June NIKKEI KINYU, in order to promote the 
salability of the bonds, the Finance Corp. will focus on the sales 
strength of issuers when it revises the composition of its 
underwriters.  It is moving to decrease the share allotted to banks 
from the current 77 percent to 70 percent and increase the share 
allotted to securities firms from 23 to 30 percent.  Regional banks, 
which have been traditionally weak in selling these bonds, would 
lose their share to the major commercial and long-term credit banks, 
while certain securities firms, which have been prohibited from 
participating, will be allowed to enter the securities underwriting 
syndicates.  Foreign securities firms, along with newly established 
securities subsidiaries of banks, are to be included in the 
securities underwriting syndicates for the first time. 

   The Finance Corp. could institute the new share system as early 
as its July 1994 issue of the bonds, NIKKEI KINYU reported.  Because 
it is the largest issuer of government-backed bonds, the Finance 
Corp.'s steps to revise its underwriting system may influence other 
issuers to do the same. 
   Foreign Trade and Investment - CENTRAL ASIAN REPUBLICS:  Central 
Asian Economic Committees Launched -- The joint economic committees 
recently established in Japan to promote trade and investment in the 
Central Asian republics of Kazakhstan, Uzbekistan, Kyrgyzstan, and 
Turkmenistan, will hold their first meetings in the latter half of 
1994, according to the 14 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  The 
committees were formed in December 1993 as the result of a 
"government-private sector joint economic mission" sponsored by the 
Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) to the four 
republics.  According to the 18 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the 
four committees, formed by Japan's general trading companies, steel 
manufacturers, and mining companies, are under the auspices of the 
"Japan Association for Trade with Russia and Central-Eastern Europe" 
which is a MITI-designated industry association.  The goal of the 
committees is to strengthen economic ties between Japan and the 
resource-rich republics, which will receive official development 
assistance from the Japanese Government. 

   The biggest of the four committees is the Japan-Kazakhstan Joint 
Economic Committee chaired by Shinroku Morohashi, chairman of 
Mitsubishi Corp., who headed the government-private sector mission 
to Central Asia.  It has 32 corporate members.  The Japan-Uzbekistan 
Joint Economic Committee, which has 17 members, is chaired by 
Naohiko Kumagai, president of Mitsui and Co.  The Japan-Kyrgyzstan 
Joint Economic Committee has 14 members and is chaired by Tomiichi 
Akiyama, president of Sumitomo Corp.  The Japan-Turkmenistan Joint 
Economic Committee is chaired by Minoru Murofushi, president of 
Itochu Corp., and has 13 members, according to the 18 March NIKKEI 
SANGYO. 

   The first meeting of the Japan-Kazakhstan committee will be held 
on 9 and 10 June, according to the 14 April NIKKAN KOGYO.  In 
addition to 58 projects that have been proposed within the 
committee, it will discuss holding a Kazakhstani industrial trade 
fair and inviting Kazakhstani researchers to Japan to study 
technology.  Trade with Kazakhstan totalled $96 million in 1993, the 
highest among the Central Asian republics, according to the 18 March 
NIKKEI SANGYO.  The 17 May NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that Uzbek 
President Islam Karimov met with leaders of the Japan-Uzbekistan 
committee during his recent visit to Japan to request cooperation in 
modernizing Uzbekistan's communications networks, establishing 
airport facilities, and developing its gold mining capabilities. 

   CHINA:  Omron To Set Up Cash Register Production Joint Venture -- 
Omron, Japan's leading manufacturer of control components, will 
establish a joint venture company in Beijing by August to produce 
electronic cash registers and point-of-sale terminals.  The joint 
venture company, Beijing Gaoteng Business Computer Systems Co. Ltd., 
will be capitalized at $5 million, with the Omron Group contributing 
25 percent, China Great Wall Computer Software and Systems Company 
45 percent, Beijing Sitong New Technologies Industry Co. Ltd.--an 
office equipment sales company--20 percent, and the Qingdao 
Television Factory 10 percent.  Beijing Gaoteng will begin full- 
scale operations in early 1995 with about 55 workers and will 
produce 1.1 billion yen ($10.5 million) worth of point-of-sale 
terminals annually.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 13 Jun 94 p 13) 

   Toray To Build Polyester Production Base in Jiangsu -- Toray 
Industries, Japan's largest manufacturer of synthetic fibers, will 
invest 50 billion yen ($476 million) to build an integrated 
polyester production base in China by the end of 1998.  The base, to 
be located on a 1 million-square-meter site in Nantong City, Jiangsu 
Province will be developed in two phases.  In the first phase a mill 
will be built by mid-1996 to weave and dye polyester long fibers and 
polyester short fiber-cotton blends.  The polyester will be supplied 
by Toray's plants in Thailand, Indonesia, and Malaysia.  In the 
second phase the Nantong mill will produce its own polyester fibers 
and raw cotton. 

   Toray's goal is for annual sales of about 100 billion yen ($952 
million).  When the mill reaches full operation, it will produce 
about as much product as all of Toray's operations in Southeast Asia 
combined.  All production will be sold in China or exported to 
Europe and America; none will be exported to Japan.  (Tokyo ASAHI 
SHIMBUN 3 Jun 94 p 12) 

   Taoka Chemical Forms Synthetic Dye Joint Venture in Tianjin -- 
Taoka Chemical Company, an organic chemical manufacturer affiliated 
with the Sumitomo Group, has established a joint venture company in 
Tianjin to manufacture synthetic dyes.  The new joint venture 
company, Taoka Chemical Tianjin Co. Ltd., is capitalized at 
$900,000, with Taoka contributing 31 percent, Tianjin City Dye 
Chemicals 50 percent, and Sumitomo Corp., 19 percent.  Taoka expects 
the joint venture company to produce about $1.1 million worth of 
dyes in its first fiscal year, which will be exported to Europe and 
the United States.  Taoka had been contracting the production of 
synthetic dyes to Tianjin City Dye Chemicals' No. 5 Factory, but 
decided to form a joint venture company to meet increasing demand. 
(Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 14) 

   KDK To Establish Electrode Foil Production Operations in 
Guangdong -- KDK, one of only two companies in Japan specializing in 
the manufacture of aluminum electrode foil for capacitors, will 
invest about 500 million yen ($4.8 million) to establish a plant in 
Dongguan, Guangdong Province, to manufacture electrode foil and a 
joint venture company in Hong Kong to own and operate it.  KDK will 
build the plant on a 32,500-square-meter industrial site in Dongguan 
City and equip it with six low-pressure forming machines and a 
sealing rubber production facility.  The plant, Dongguan KDK 
Aluminum Foil Manufacturing Co. Ltd., is scheduled to begin 
operations this fall and will have a monthly production capacity of 
200 million units. 

   KDK will also set up a joint venture company, Hong Kong KDK, 
together with Faston, a Hong Kong firm, to own and operate Dongguan 
KDK.  Hong Kong KDK will be capitalized at HK$8 million ($1 
million), with KDK contributing 49 percent and Faston the remainder. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 13) 

   VIETNAM:  Itochu-Isuzu Joint Venture To Assemble Small Trucks -- 
Itochu Corp., one of Japan's "big five" general trading companies, 
and Isuzu Motors, a major manufacturer of trucks and commercial 
vehicles, have decided to form a joint venture company with 
Vietnamese partners to assemble small trucks in Ho Chi Minh City. 
The local partners are "Vietnamese peoples committees and 
individuals"--which presumably includes the Ho Chi Minh City 
Government.  Negotiations with the Vietnamese partners are at the 
final stage and a formal joint venture agreement should be concluded 
by yearend.  This will be the first light truck assembly project in 
Vietnam by a Japanese automaker.  The project a1so marks Itochu's 
first joint venture in Vietnam. 

   The scope of the joint venture and its capitalization have not 
been finalized, but capital investment is expected to be around $20 
million, with Itochu and Isuzu contributing 70 percent.  Plans are 
to begin the construction of a Ho Chi Minh City assembly plant in 
early 1995 for completion by the summer of 1996.  Production will 
begin at a rate of 2,000-3,000 light trucks per year.  In the future 
output will be expanded to three types of vehicles at a level of 
5,000 units annually. 

   Itochu is also planning a joint venture involving passenger car 
production in Vietnam.  In addition, it is eyeing "significant" 
joint ventures in other sectors of Vietnam's economy "at a pace of 
four to five each year," so that after 4-5 years it will have 20-30 
joint ventures operating there.  (Tokyo NIKRAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 27 May 
94 p 1) 

   Construction Companies Open Offices in Hanoi -- Nishimatsu 
Construction, a general contracting company that specializes in 
large civil engineering projects, will open an office in Hanoi in 
mid-May, according to the 19 May NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Nishimatsu 
plans to compete for construction contracts in northern Vietnam 
where the infrastructure is less developed than in the south.  It 
will seek contracts from Japanese companies that are building 
factories in Vietnam and will compete for infrastructural projects 
funded by Japanese official development assistance (ODA), such as 
water and sewer projects and road construction. 

   Nishimatsu will staff its Hanoi office with two Japanese 
executives and four Vietnamese employees.  The number of local 
employees will rise as Nishimatsu wins contracts.  Working closely 
with Japanese trading companies, the office will gather information 
on various construction projects being planned in Vietnam. 

   NIKKEI SANGYO observed that Japan's largest general construction 
companies, such as Obayashi and Kajima, have already established 
offices in Vietnam. 

   Kumagai Gumi, a large general construction company, also has 
opened an office in Hanoi, according to the 24 May NIKKEI SANGYO. 
The company plans to compete for contracts to build infrastructural 
projects, particularly in northern Vietnam.  Its office will be 
staffed initially by one Japanese officer and two Vietnamese 
employees.  The company aims to win contracts worth 2 to 5 billion 
yen ($19-48 million) within three to five years, centering on 
projects financed by Japanese ODA funds. 

   Kumagai will develop its Vietnam office as a "core site" in 
strengthening its Southeast Asian operations.  The company is 
examining the establishment of joint ventures in the future to 
secure construction materials and manpower.  For FY94 the company 
hopes to have contracts in Southeast Asia worth 30 billion yen ($286 
million).  It plans to increase the growth in contract amounts in 
Southeast Asia from the current level of 5 percent of its worldwide 
business to 7 percent. 

   Glass Industry - MITI Denies Report of Tariff Cuts, Prepares for 
Glass Talks -- The Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) has made plans to unilaterally abolish tariffs on imported 
sheet glass and will make an offer to this effect at working-level 
talks with the United States in June, according to the 31 May 
evening edition of the NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Japan's 
highest tariff on sheet glass, 6.3 percent, is lower than the U.S. 
maximum rate of 8.8 percent, but according to NIKKEI, MITI's offer 
to abolish the tariffs is designed to gain U.S. "understanding" of 
MITI's position on other measures to ensure market access. 

   However, a 31 May KYODO News Agency report in English said that 
an unidentified "senior" MITI official denied the NIKKEI story.  The 
official stated that the report is "totally groundless" and "MITI 
has not heard anything about the reported plan." 

   The United States is seeking "objective criteria" for measuring 
the extent of glass imports into the Japanese market, but according 
to NIKKEI, Japan and the United States will "inevitably" differ over 
the definition of these criteria.  MITI is willing to conduct a 
survey of wholesalers that are actually trading in imported sheet 
glass, but NIKKEI stated that the ministry will not agree to U.S. 
demands for setting a "future number" of imported glass distributors 
as part of the criteria. 

   The NIKKEI article also reported that MITI will refuse a U.S. 
demand that private firms prepare import purchase plans.  According 
to MITI, it would be "too difficult" to make such plans because 
"most" glass distributors and traders are small and medium-sized 
firms.  Instead, MITI will ask consumers of sheet glass, such as 
construction companies and sash makers, to compile procurement 
"guidelines" that clearly state that they are not bound to trade 
only within their keiretsu or corporate affiliates.  MITI is also 
considering dispatching a joint public and private group to survey 
procurement opportunities in the United States. 

   According to NIKKEI, MITI hopes to reach an agreement with the 
United States before Super 301 trade provisions come into effect in 
September.  However, depending on how the United States evaluates 
the Japanese position, the negotiations could be "protracted." 

   Asahi Glass To Raise Price of Sheet Glass Despite Weak Demand -- 
Asahi Glass Co., Japan's largest integrated glass manufacturer and a 
member of the Mitsubishi Group, announced that it will raise the 
price of commercial sheet glass by 7 to 8 percent in July to boost 
sagging profits, the 27 May NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported. 
According to the firm's financial statements, Asahi's sales fell 
nearly 5 percent in FY93 while its unconsolidated operating profits 
over two years fell more than 68 percent from a FY91 high of 47.768 
billion yen ($455 million) to 15.271 billion yen ($145 million) in 
FY93.  NIKKEI stated that Asahi is raising its prices for the first 
time in more than three years because the firm is "increasingly 
burdened" by fixed costs and is finding it "difficult" to maintain 
profitability. 

   Asahi believes the higher prices will hold because earlier this 
year it discontinued the practice of "after-the-fact price 
adjustment," in which it discounted the market price after delivery 
to distributors.  Now, without discounts or rebates from Asahi, 
distributors and glass traders are responsible for the final market 
price.  According to NIKKEI, this will gradually eliminate the 
heretofore "extremely" low market prices.  Asahi will also begin 
setting its prices monthly, instead of quarterly, to better resp9nd 
to market changes. 

   Asahi also believes its competitive position has improved vis-a- 
vis companies dealing in imported glass.  According to NIKKEI, these 
firms are having difficulty making a profit, despite the advantage 
of the high yen.  Japan imported about $101.31 million worth of 
sheet glass in FY93, which totaled 7.7 percent of the domestic 
market, the 31 May NIKKEI reported.  Over half that amount, however, 
was imported from Japanese production bases overseas. 

   Nevertheless, it is not certain whether Asahi's price increases 
will hold, NIKKEI said, since the economic environment is not 
conducive to price increases.  Demand for commercial sheet glass is 
weak due to the recession in the construction industry, which shows 
little sign of ending.  According to the 28 April NIKKEI, sheet 
glass shipments fell 7 percent in FY93, due to a collapse in orders 
for nonresidential construction.  Furthermore, general contractors 
and other glass consumers are taking a harder line on reducing costs 
and continue to demand price reductions, the 27 May NIKKEI noted. 
Consequently, the price of standard sheet glass at specialty 
wholesale stores in Tokyo has fallen over 15 percent the past year. 
If Asahi's price increases do hold, NIKKEI said, other glassmakers 
will likely raise their prices as well. 

   Nonferrous Metals - Showa Denko To Withdraw From Titanium 
Refining, Sales -- Showa Denko, Japan's fourth largest chemical 
manufacturer, will stop selling titanium sponge, and its titanium 
refining subsidiary, Showa Titanium, will stop refining titanium 
this year because of decreasing demand from the aircraft and defense 
industries, according to the 25 May NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Showa 
Denko, which began titanium sponge sales in 1982 and recorded annual 
sales of several billion yen, is expected to incur more than 4 
billion yen ($38 million) in extraordinary losses related to this 
move.  Showa Titanium, which has a refinery capable of handling 
3,300 tons of titanium annually, will continue manufacturing ceramic 
products and products made of other alloys. 

   The 25 May ASAHI SHIMBUN observed that after Showa Denko ends its 
titanium operations, only two Japanese companies will remain in the 
titanium refining industry--Toho Titanium and Sumitomo Sitix, 
formerly Osaka Titanium. 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Survey Shows Shareholding 
Effective in Reforming Enterprise -- In early 1994, several research 
offices subordinate to the State Council, the Economic and Trade 
Commission, the Enterprise Management Association, the State 
Planning Commission, and the Stock Issuing Supervisory Commission 
conducted a joint survey to investigate results of shareholding 
implementation.  Researchers sent out 1,000 sets of questionnaires 
to respondents in 371 shareholding enterprises nationwide to elicit 
facts and opinions. 

   The survey results are: 

1. Public ownership is the mainstay as indicated by the following 
figures: 


     Shares owned by the state                        33.8% 
     Shares owned by legal entities                   45.2% 
     Shares owned by individuals                      19.4% 
     Foreign ownership                                 1.6% 

2. Opinion on changes of operational mechanism after enterprises 
were transformed into shareholding system: 

     Enterprise made fundamental changes              24.7% 
     Enterprise made major changes                    53.7% 
     Enterprise made no changes                        2.0% 

3. Comparison of enterprise yearly performance and workers benefits 
before and after shareholding: 

     Labor Productivity                                 +57.3% 
     Profits and tax earned by average worker           +85.2% 
     Profits/sales ratio                                +49.2% 
     Profits/capital ratio                              +39.3% 
     Average worker's salary                            +44.0% 



4.  Priorities:  Respondents regard transforming government 
functions, reforming enterprise property rights, and improving the 
market system as the three top priorities in enterprise reform. 

5.  Problem:  Government supervisory units and other state units 
that enterprises must depend upon for the completion of tasks cause 
the most trouble.  Although 75.9 percent of shareholding enterprises 
are now subordinate to various government organs or rely on other 
state units for completion of tasks, only 22.5 percent of the 
respondents consider such subordination necessary.  To conclude, the 
survey indicates transforming government functions is the thorniest 
task in enterprise reform. (Beijing JINGJI RIBAO 8 May 1994, p 1) 

   Article Examines Obstacles To Developing Machine-Building 
Industry -- The system of planned investment management does not 
meet the development needs of the machine-building industry.  At 
present, investment plans are directed only at the domestic market, 
investment is scattered, limited investment is not used where it it 
is needed most, and investment projects are not strongly 
competitive.  In addition, approval procedures for investment 
projects are tedious and may take one to two years. 

   An irrational economic managment system creates duplication in 
construction projects, which causes an imbalance in trade and 
enterprise distribution and low economic efficiency in China's 
machine-building industry.  For a long time, a divided departmental 
and regional management system has caused the domestic market to be 
segmented and irrational protectionism has become more severe every 
day.  Enterprises cannot compete fairly and superior products cannot 
be developed.  The practice of separate budgetary plans for the 
central and local authorities encourages local governments to focus 
on increasing financial resources.  Thus, local governments invest 
in projects that will immediately earn money.  Little attention, for 
example, is given to the need to provide spare parts because this 
kind of enterprise does not immediately generate profits. At 
present, the level of specialization in spare parts in the machine- 
building industry is only one third or less of the level in 
industrially-developed countries. 

   Enterprise equipment is poor, the ability of enterprises to 
develop on their own initiative is weak, the replacment of old 
products with new ones is slow, and labor productivity is low.  Of 
current equipment in the machinery industry, less than 5 percent 
consists of numerically-controlled, precision, or highly efficient 
equipment.  Less than 2 percent of the enterprises have the ability 
to develop because the level of automation and use of new technology 
is low.  The time needed to develop new products is three times that 
of industrially-developed countries.  In 1955 labor productivity in 
Japan's machine-building industry was 2.4 times that of China's, in 
1975 it was 8.6 times, and today it is 20 times higher. 

   The ability to produce high-grade products is insufficient to 
meet needs even though lower tech products are being overproduced. 
At present, China overproduces by 30-40 percent low-grade industrial 
boilers, small machines, machine tools, etc.  The production of new 
technical products does not meet the needs of China's domestic 
industries, thus leading to a trade deficit of over $10 billion. 
With the expansion of the world economy and trade, competition among 
countries and regions has intensified and this will increase the 
difficulty in exporting China's machine-building products.  The 
machine-building industry cannot ignore the impact of increased 
imports due to reduced trade barriers after China rejoins the GATT. 
Although China is beginning to develop new technical products, they 
are no match for the more technically advanced, higher quality, and 
large-scale production of imports.  Prices and production costs for 
domestic products are much higher than those for the same products 
on the international market. 

   Continued reform and opening up will accelerate development of 
the machine-building industry.  First, reform of the investment 
system will give enterprises more decisionmaking authority over 
investment and improve the use of funds.  Establishment of an 
import-export bank will help to expand machine-building exports. 
Establishment of a development bank will help adjust industrial 
distribution and promote a rational product mix.   Second, reform of 
the tax system will increase the tax burden on machine-building 
enterprises, but elimination of separate budgets for central and 
local authorities will promote the role of markets and support the 
production of superior products and eliminate inferior ones.  Third, 
reform of the foreign trade system, especially changes in the 
renminbi foreign exchange rates will help expand machine-building 
exports.  At the same time, the cost of enterprise imports will 
rise, which will lead enterprises to increase investment in science 
and technology, accelerate domestic output, and thereby reduce the 
trade deficit for machine-building products. (Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO 
25 May 94 p 2) 

   Bleak Outlook for Textile Exports in 1994 -- At present China's 
textile exports are facing difficulties and the outlook is bleak. 
Cotton output has declined in the United States, China, and 
Pakistan, and textile prices have increased on the international 
market.  In China, a decrease in cotton output has led to a severe 
shortage of raw material.  Even while procurement prices have 
increased, price swings have become pronounced and export 
enterprises are extremely reluctant to take orders from foreign 
businessmen due to the uncertainties.  As a result, both the foreign 
exchange earnings and quantity of textile exports have declined. 

   According to one company, because of the sharp rise in domestic 
raw material prices, unstable markets, and constant changes in 
prices, export enterprises cannot offer to fix prices in advance for 
foreign businessmen and do not dare to take orders.  Most contracts 
being fulfilled now are old ones.  The company also reported that 
foreign busineesmen have said that if China does not supply the 
material, it will go to the Pakistan and India markets.  (Shenyang 
LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO 12 May 94 p 3) 

   Pudong Plans 100,000-Ton Shipyard -- Pudong plans to build a 
100,000-ton shipyard in Waigaoqiao, for which the basic engineering 
work has been completed.  The shipyard will be located at the 
Nangang He section at the mouth of Chang Jiang, 12 km from the mouth 
of Wusong and 3 km from Gaoqiao town.  It will cover an area of 
200,000 square meters.  With modern shipbuilding and repairing 
facilities, the shipyard will be able to repair ships for domestic 
and foreign clients.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0622 0559 GMT 
3 Jun 94) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Singapore Investing in 
International Facilities for Yantai City -- The Yantai City People's 
Government and Tangcheng Holdings Company Limited of Singapore 
signed an agreement on 14 May to jointly build the Yantai-Singapore 
international facilities in Yantai. This international city will be 
located in the eastern part of Yantai City proper, covering 658,888 
square meters.  The main buildings include an international meeting 
center and other facilities.  Total investment is $200 million. 
(Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO 15 May 94 p 1) 

   First Yen-Denominated Floating Rate Notes Issued -- The People's 
Construction Bank of China (PCBC) has unveiled the first yen- 
denominated, Chinese Euro/Dragon, floating-rate note issue.  The 
seven-year notes are worth 15 billion yen and carry an interest 
spread of 0.45 points over the six-month yen Libor.  The use of 
Japanese yen is favorable for the PCBC because cheaper funds can be 
obtained once the notes are swapped for other principal foreign 
currencies, such as the U.S. dollar.  Sales are restricted to 
investors based in Hong Kong, Japan, Singapore, Britain, and the 
United States.  (Hong Kong HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 2 
Jun 94 p 5) 

   Thai Group to Build Industrial Park in Henan's Luohe -- The Thai 
Cathay Group plans to cooperate with Henan's Luohe in building a 
"Thai city" and a "Thai industrial park."  The two projects, which 
will be located along the Beijing-Shenzhen 107 highway in an area of 
9 square km, will involve a total investment of $5 billion.  The 
"Thai city" will include finance and trade companies, offices, 
management firms, purchasing centers, conference halls, and 
exhibition centers, as well as commercial buildings, miniatures of 
world scenic spots, amusement parks, a racecourse, tourism 
facilities, a 28-story international information center, schools, 
and hospitals.  The "Thai industrial park" will include 500 foreign- 
funded enterprises.  It will include high-tech, food processing, 
textile and light industries, pollution-free  chemical, 
pharmaceutical, metallurgical, and farm produce processing zones. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 25 May 94 p 21) 

   Guangdong Trade Delegates Hold Trade Talks in Paris -- A 
Guangdong provincial trade delegation, headed by Yu Fei, vice 
chairman of the Standing Committee of the Guangdong Provincial 
People's Congress, met in Paris with about 100 representatives of 
French trade, entrepreneurial, and financial circles on June 1. 
Investments totaling $900 million were sought for transport, energy, 
and infrastructure projects, including ten railway lines with a 
total length of 2,000 km, 23 express highways, eight large coal- 
fired power plants, and the province's second nuclear power plant. 
The 170-member delegation also staged a week-long commodities trade 
expo in Paris.  Products from more than 80 companies were displayed. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1207 GMT 2 Jun 94) 

   Fujian Signs Contracts for Nine Foreign Projects -- A Fujian 
trade delegation signed contracts for nine foreign-invested projects 
in Hong Kong yesterday, involving a total investment of $670 million 
and use of $580 million of foreign capital.  The projects include 
the Fuzhou International Shipping Center, Fuqing Pacific Building 
Materials, Fuqing Yongsheng Real Estate, and Xiamen Xiangyu Bonded 
Zone reclamation.  Fujian hopes foreign investors will invest in 
power plants, highways, port construction, and the transformation of 
state enterprises.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 25 May 94 p 17) 

   Quanzhou, Fujian Attracts $1 Billion of Foreign Investment -- In 
five days of trade talks held in Hong Kong, Zeng Huabin, vice mayor 
of Quanzhou, said that the city signed contracts for 450 projects, 
involving a total investment of $1 billion.  The projects, which 
focus on infrastructure and construction of industrial development 
zones, include:  the Macao Baoshing Group agreement with the Shishi 
Xinfa Shareholding Company to build a 10,000-ton port, involving a 
total investment of $20.69 million, with the term of cooperation 
lasting 50 years; the Hong Kong Nanfang International Trading 
Company agreement with the Quanzhou Shunde Huashui Hydropower 
Development Project, involving a total investment of 220 million 
yuan, with Nanfang International holding 70 percent of the stakes; 
and the Hong Kong Zhenhua Investment Company's contract with the 
Quanzhou Jinjiang Power Company to build the Jinjiang Diesel Power 
Plant, involving an investment of $12 million, including $9.6 
million invested by Zhenhua Investment.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN 
SHE 1222 GMT 28 May 94) 

   Fujian's Sanduao Attracts Foreign Investment -- There are more 
than 70 foreign-funded enterprises in Sanduao, Fujian, involving a 
total investment of 1 billion yuan.  Planning for the $5.5 billion 
petrochemical plant has been completed.  The project has been 
approved by the Fujian Government and submitted to the State Council 
for examination.  To meet the needs of the project, the city plans 
to build a 300,000-ton crude oil berth, two 50,000-ton berths for 
oil products, a 10,000-ton berth for bulk cargo, a 10,000-ton 
container berth, a 200,000-ton water plant, and a 400,000-kw thermal 
power plant.  To accelerate the development of Sanduao, a 
development zone has been set up in Chengao.  The Shanghai-Guangzhou 
optical fiber line, which runs through Sanduao, has gone into 
operation, the surveying and planning for the Fuzhou-Sanduoa railway 
has been completed, and construction of a 20-km highway has started. 
The city also plans to establish 2,000 programmed telephone lines. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1031 GMT 31 May 94) 

   Shantou Cooperates With Singapore in Building Rolling Mill -- 
Shantou's Hongxing International Corporation signed a contract with 
Singapore's Donggang Steel Company Limited to jointly invest $20 
million to build a steel rolling mill in Shantou.  The mill, to be 
located in the Longhu district, will use new South Korean and 
Taiwanese technology.  The main products include various types of 
special-shaped hollow and solid steel.  The mill will turn out 
100,000 tons by the end of 1995 and 250,000 tons in 1996, with 
annual output value of 1 billion yuan.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1404 GMT 25 May 94) 

   Pudong Processing Zone Attracts High-Tech Multinational 
Corporations -- Multinational corporations from 18 countries have 
invested in the Jinqiao Export Processing Zone in Pudong, mainly in 
high-technology industries, including computers, telecommunications, 
lasers, and biological technology.  Nearly a third of some 200 
projects registered are now in production.  For example, Bell of 
Belgium and Siemens of Germany have set up a joint venture which 
should boost the city's telecommunications industry.  (Beijing CHINA 
DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 5-11 Jun 94 p 4) 

   Dalian Seeks 2 Billion Yuan for Dalian-Yantai Railway Ferry -- 
The central government attaches great importance to the building of 
the Bohai Bay transportation network.  Zhu Rongji and Zou Jiahua 
have given their consent to the plan.  The Dalian-Yantai railway 
ferry, an important link in the network, will require an investment 
of over 2 billion yuan.  As Liaoning and Shandong lack funds, they 
will try to attract capital through various channels.  A Dalian 
official said that foreign investment in the huge project is 
welcome.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 27 May 94 p 21) 

   Jiangxi Sets Up Investment Zone for Taiwan Businesses -- A state- 
level investment zone for Taiwan businesses was set up in Jiangxi's 
Gongqingcheng.  On 30 April, Wang Zhaoguo, director of the State 
Council's Taiwan Affairs Office, came to Gongqingcheng to inspect 
the investment zone.  Gongqingcheng is located in the middle of the 
Nanchang-Jiujiang industrial corridor and is endowed with a 
favorable natural, social, and economic environment.  As Taiwan 
investment in the mainland now extends into interior areas, the 
Gongqingcheng investment zone provides a very good opportunity that 
should not be missed.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 31 May 94 p 7) 

   Yunnan Seeks Foreign Partners To Build Kunming-Bangkok Railway -- 
To increase Yunnan's contacts with the outside world, a Yunnan 
official said that the province is determined to build a 
transnational railway from Kunming to Bangkok, which would run 
through Laos and Burma.  The Yunnan section of the railway will 
require an investment of at least $700 million.  The proposal has 
been submitted to the State Council and State Planning Commission 
for approval.  The province is accelerating efforts to prepare a 
feasibility study.  Thailand's prime minister led an industrial and 
commercial delegation to China earlier this year and spoke highly of 
the project.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 26 May 94 p 27) 

   Xinjiang Airlines To Open International Routes -- In June this 
year, Xinjiang Airlines will open three new international routes: 
Tianj in-Urumqi-New Siberia-Moscow, Urumqi-Islamabad, and Urumqi- 
Chongqing-Hong Kong.  Zhang Ruipu, general manager of Xinjiang 
Airlines, said these routes fit in with Xinjiang's strategy of 
linking its economy with the outside world.  (Beijing GUANGMING 
RIBAO 21 May 94 p 4) 

   Hong Kong's CITIC Real Estate Investment in Fuzhou -- CITIC Hong 
Kong and the Shenzhen Yueye Company have signed an agreement on a 
$137 million real estate joint venture in Yuefang and Quanzhou in 
Fuzhou.  This is one of 481 foreign investment projects entailing 
total investment of $3.5 billion obtained so far by delegations 
attending "China Trade and Investment '94," which was held recently 
in Hong Kong.  Other deals worth over $100 million are for the 
construction of the Fuzhou International Maritime Entrepot Center, 
an industrial project in Xiamen involving Singapore's Huiya 
Investment Group, and a glass factory joint venture involving Hong 
Kong's Pacific Group and Zhangzhou City.  Of the 481 deals, 324 
involved investors from Hong Kong and Taiwan. (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 
27 May 94 p 17) 

   Hong Kong Company Involved in Fujian Infrastructure Development 
-- According to Yu Shao-Ki, general manager of the construction firm 
Chung Fuk, the company is involved in a number of infrastructure 
projects on the mainland, including a hydroelectric plant joint 
venture with the Ministry of Water Resources and Fujian Province on 
the Muyangxi River involving a total investment of 2.1 billion yuan; 
and the 42-km Zhangzhou-Xiamen Highway, in cooperation with the Bank 
of China Group and China Merchants Steam Navigation with a total 
investment of 1.4 billion yuan. The firm's other projects are a 100 
million yuan investment in the Xiangzhi Port District in Guangdong's 
Quanzhou City, which consists of two multipurpose wharves with a 
total annual capacity 800,000 tons, roads, warehouses, and new 
towns, and a share in the construction of the 380 million yuan 
Suzhou-Shanghai airport expressway. (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 
1248 GMT 30 May 94) 

   Some 100,000 Hong Kong Firms Said Operating in Mainland China -- 
Dong Shuikui, deputy director of the State General Administration of 
Taxation, said that Hong Kong firms rank first in terms of total 
foreign investment in China.  Hong Kong accounts for more than 
100,000 of the approximately 170,000 foreign firms operating on the 
mainland.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1031 GMT 31 May 94) 

   Hong Kong's Shougang Concord Acquires 51 Percent of Hebei Plate 
Mill -- Shougang Concord International is buying a 51 percent stake 
in the Qinhuangdao Shougang Plate Mill in Hebei province from its 
parent, Shougang Holdings, for 535.9 million yuan in cash and 
shares.  The Hebei mill began production in March last year and has 
an annual capacity of 350,000 tons of steel plates and 200,000 tons 
of coiled steel sheets.  Shougang Concord said it intends to expand 
the mill's capacity. (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS 
POST) 3 June 94 p 3) 

   Hong Kong Economic Interaction With Mainland Viewed -- Hong 
Kong's external trade grew 7 percent to HK$91.44 billion over the 
same period last year.  Economists did not blame the slowing 
mainland economy but instead said that Hong Kong could not be 
expected to sustain the rapid growth seen in recent years.  They 
also said slower growth was inevitable given the larger export base. 
Reexports grew 10 percent to 74.82 billion, while domestic exports 
fell 6.7 percent to $16.62 billion.   Hongkong Bank economist Jim 
Wong pointed to China's trade figures for April which showed that 
the mainland's imports grew by 25.3 percent while exports increased 
by 29.6 percent.  Wong said that the purported growth in China's 
foreign trade did not correspond with the slowdown in Hong Kong's 
reexports.  Wong said China's trade performance in April suggested 
the slowdown could be due to a downturn in other markets.  On an 
aggregate basis, in the first four months, exports grew 8.1 percent 
to HK$333.43 billion, reexports grew 12.5 percent to HK$272.07 
billion, and domestic exports fell 7.8 percent to $61.35 billion. 
(Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 28 May 94 p 1) 

   Taiwan:  Restrictions on Fruit Imports Lifted, Tariffs Cut -- The 
Council of Agriculture of the Executive Yuan decided to abolish 
restrictions on importing apples and 15 other kinds of fruits from 
specific regions ahead of schedule.  It also decided to further 
reduce tariffs on farm produce to prevent the issue of open 
agricultural markets from adversely affecting Taiwan's effort to 
join GATT by the end of the year.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 23 May 
94 p 1) 

   Exports Up 1.5 Percent, Imports 2.2 Percent in Second Quarter -- 
Based on a survey on import and export intentions, the Directorate 
General of Budget, Accounting, and Statistics under the Executive 
Yuan noted that because of declining export competitiveness, the 
total value of exports for the second quarter of this year is 
estimated at $22.24 billion, only 1.5 percent higher than the same 
quarter last year.  Total value of imports is projected at  $20.34 
billion, up 2.2 percent.  Among the export goods, electronics and 
electric machinery have the biggest growth rate at 9.98 percent, 
followed by chemical and plastics at 5.32 percent, and vehicles at 
4.12 percent.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 25 May p 2) 

   Market Share of Imported Light Industry Products Exceeds 50 
Percent -- According to the Council for Economic Planning and 
Development, the share of the imported light industry products 
exceeded 50 percent for the first time last year.  The council said 
this indicated that domestically-made light industry products are 
not only losing out in international markets to those made by PRC 
and Southeast Asian companies, but also in the Taiwan domestic 
market.  In 1985, the share of imported light industry products was 
only 10.72 percent.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 29 May p 1) 

   Government To Increase Incentives for Selected Overseas 
Investments -- Foreign Minister Frederick Chien said on 30 May that 
to encourage  private firms to help the nation enhance its relations 
with foreign countries, the government has decided to expand the 
range of investment subsidies and relax loan requirements if 
companies invest in any of the 29 countries that have diplomatic 
relations with Taiwan.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 31 May p 1) 

   State Enterprises May Register Patent Rights in PRC -- The 
Mainland Affairs Council on 30 May decided to lift controls  on 
trademark and patent rights registrations in the PRC.  Except for 
inventions and innovative products that affect national security, 
state-owned institutions will be allowed to indirectly register 
their trademarks and patent rights in the PRC.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 31 May p 1) 

   Economic Growth Expected To Fall Short of 1994 Target -- Because 
of sluggish exports, the Taiwan economy grew by an annual rate of 
5.46 percent during the first quarter of 1994, nearly half a 
percentage point lower than projected.  According to preliminary 
estimates, the economy will grow 5.94 percent for the whole of 1994 
and, for the third consecutive year, will fall short of the target 
set in the national development program.  The Directorate General of 
Budget, Accounting, and Statistics attributed the poor performance 
to a sharp decline in the merchandise trade surplus, which stands at 
$240 million, as well as lower income from interest on foreign 
exchange.  The merchandise and service trade accounts posted a 
combined deficit of $560 million.  The directorate general, however, 
predicted an export upturn in the second quarter, as the world 
economy shows increasingly clear signs of recovery.  It also 
forecast that this year's exports will top $89.6 billion, up 5.55 
percent over last year, while imports will reach $82.7 billion, up 
7.27 percent, to produce a trade surplus of $6.9 billion, or a 12 
percent decline.  The per capita GNP in 1994 will be $11,236 and the 
economy will grow 6.19 percent and 6.22 percent, respectively, in 
the first and second quarters of next year. (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
PAO 21 May 94 p 1) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Government Official Discusses Plans To Boost 
Foreign Trade -- At the Seventh Session of the Ninth Supreme 
People's Assembly in April, Yi Song-tae, chairman of the State 
External Economic Affairs Commission, stated that the DPRK plans to 
put a priority on expanding export markets and maintaining its 
"credibility" in an effort to develop foreign trade.  Yi also 
discussed North Korea's strategies to diversify and increase the 
volume of export products, primarily clothing, metals, and processed 
goods. 

   According to Yi, the DPRK will concentrate on making Southeast 
Asia, the Middle East, and the Near East its principal markets.  It 
also plans to increase trade with capitalist countries, such as the 
European Union countries, and to actively pursue trade with the 
Central and South American countries.  Concurrently, the DPRK will 
continue to develop trade with China, the CIS, and Eastern European 
countries. 

   The DPRK, in particular, will focus on the clothing processing 
sector, Yi noted.  The government will establish clothing processing 
bases throughout the country, modernize the existing factories, and 
"massively" increase production by using its labor force more 
effectively, according to Yi.  In addition, the government plans to 
export more items that have "strategic meaning," such as nonferrous 
metals, iron and steel, cement, and magnesia clinker.  At the same 
time, it will set up additional secondary and tertiary processing 
bases and process raw materials either into semi-processed goods or 
finished products for export, Yi said. 

   Yi promised that the DPRK will enforce regulations on contract 
terms.  He added that the government will formulate stringent import 
rules requiring guaranteed collaterals to insure that payments will 
be made on schedule.  Overall, the government will strengthen trade 
regulations, unify prices and trade activities, and ensure that all 
companies strictly comply with regulations, Yi asserted.  (Pyongyang 
MINJU CHOSON 7 April 94 p 3) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Coal Companies, Conglomerates Eye Korea 
Gas Privatization -- SUMMARY:  The Korea Coal Association has 
established a consortium to participate in the planned privatization 
of Korea Gas, according to recent  Seoul press reports.  In 
addition, the association has adopted a recommendation requesting 
the government's "cooperation" in allowing coal firms to acquire 
Korea Gas.  Meanwhile, large ROK conglomerates are gearing up to 
compete for the company.  Several sources noted that the coal 
industry will have little chance of success if it has to compete 
with the conglomerates. 

   According to the 19 April TONGA ILBO, the Korea Coal Association 
has established a consortium that will participate in the 
privatization of Korea Gas.  The ROK Government will reportedly 
begin drawing up plans for the privatization that will take place in 
May 1995.  The consortium is made up of 10 businesses:  Dongwon, 
Samtan, Kyongdong, Hanbo Energy, Kangwon Industries, Chonwon 
Industries, Samchully, Taesong Enterprises, Sampo Energy, and 
Wonjin.  Plans are for over 100 small and medium-sized coal 
companies to become involved in the consortium.  TONGA ILBO reported 
that currently the two largest investors in Korea Gas are the ROK 
Government (50 percent) and Korea Electric Power Company (34.7 
percent).  The 19 April HANGUI? KYONGJE SINMUN stated that other 
                             ? 
investors include Seoul City (7.6 percent), Kyonggi Province (1.9 
percent), Inchon City (1.2 percent), and other regional governmental 
bodies.  The paper noted that Korea Gas has paid-in capital of 177.4 
billion won ($221.75 million). 

   TONGA ILBO also said that conglomerates with coal or oil 
subsidiaries are interested in the privatization of Korea Gas. 
Currently Hyundai (Hyundai Oil Refinery), Lucky-Goldstar (Honam Oil 
Refinery), Sunkyong (Yukong), and Daerim Group are competing for the 
gas company.  The oil companies want to see firms with the 
technology and capital to develop the gas company acquire it and 
protect consumers."  Coal companies oppose the acquisition of the 
gas company by the conglomerates out of fear that the conglomerates 
will have an "energy monopoly" and further concentrate their 
economic power. 

   TONGA ILBO commented that the conglomerates and coal companies 
are "drooling over" the gas company because last year it earned over 
120 billion won ($150 million) in after-tax profits on sales of 
about 900 billion won ($1.125 billion).  In addition, demand for 
liquefied natural gas (LNG) is expected to increase rapidly in the 
future.  According to the 30 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, business 
conglomerates began forming acquisition teams early on, after they 
realized how good the gas company's prospects were. 

   According to the 19 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, the coal 
companies' efforts toward acquiring Korea Gas are related to "self- 
preservation."  The daily noted that the rapid drop in the demand 
for coal has created a "ruinous crisis" for coal companies.  In the 
last five years, anthracite consumption has dropped 62.4 percent, 
while the use of city gas has grown 900 percent.  In 1986, there 
were 361 coal mines, and now there are about 40.  The coal industry 
emphasizes that it is "morally justified" in participating in the 
LNG business, because the drop in coal consumption is due to the 
growth in gas consumption. 
? 

   In addition, the coal industry maintains that the government is 
"responsible to a certain degree" for the crisis now facing the 
industry, HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported.  First, coal producers 
have been unable to sell coal for its actual value.  According to 
the paper, from 1951 through 1993, ROK coal companies produced 530 
million tons worth an estimated 114.4 trillion won ($143 billion) at 
today's prices.  However, because of the government's price 
stability policy for coal, the coal only sold for 38 trillion won 
,$47.5 billion).  According to the coal industry's analysis, it 
sacrificed " --for the sake of the national economy--two-thirds of 
the value of the coal it produced.  Secondly, the coal industry 
argues that the government's "coal industry law" has restricted coal 
companies from investing in other business sectors.  Even during the 
Fifth Republic, coal companies could not strengthen themselves 
through diversification or conversions and prepare for the decline 
of their industry.  The Korea Coal Association has adopted a 
recommendation stating that the government "must" cooperate and 
allow the coal companies to acquire Korea Gas.  The coal industry 
has no prospects of winning a competition with large conglomerates, 
HANGU1? KYONGJE SINMUN observed.  Thus, the industry has asked the 
     ? 
government to take these difficulties into account and to offer them 
a 'private contract" for the government's share of Korea Gas. 

   In the same vein, the 30 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN noted that 
it will be "truly difficult" for the coal association to acquire any 
of Korea Gas if it is privatized through general public sales.  The 
paper reported that some sectors of society are criticizing the 
government's shift from the original principle of promoting 
managerial efficiency through privatization to promoting the profit 
motive.  This shift has resulted in large enterprises competing to 
promote themselves.  Some people are calling on the government to 
reconsider the existing method of privatization.  According to 
HANGUI? KYONGJE SINMUN, the government must consider whether the 
     ? 
criticism being aired is reasonable and look into ways to encourage 
small and medium businesses (SMB's) to participate in the 
privatization process. 
? 

   According to the 23 April TONGA ILBO, the government is actively 
considering plans to have SMB's participate in the privatization of 
public enterprises.  A MOTIE official commented that SMB 
participation would be desirable in that it would prevent large 
enterprises from monopolizing the newly privatized public 
enterprises and further concentrating their economic power.  The 
paper reported that the government is considering targeting public 
enterprises in sectors where SMB participation is possible, such as 
public enterprises that have smaller economies of scale, are suited 
to small-scale production of a variety of products, and can utilize 
regional resources.  For its part, the Small and Medium Business 
Research Institute would like SMB's to be able to participate in the 
privatization of the Korea Highway Corporation, the Korea Telephone 
Directory Co., the Agriculture and Fishery Marketing Corporation, 
the Citizens National Bank, and the Korea Tobacco and Ginseng 
Corporation. 

   FEATURE:  'Non-Official' Groups Plan New Corporate State 
Relationship -- SUMMARY:  South Korea's Ministry of Trade, Industry, 
and Energy has formed two groups to develop "countermeasures" and 
proactive policies in advance of international agreements on 
environment, trade, and technology that the government believes will 
have an impact on business practices.  According to Seoul newspaper 
reports, these "non-official" organizations are staffed by ROK 
government officials and representatives of quasi-official 
institutions.  One report suggested that this "indirect" style of 
leadership may result in even more government involvement in support 
of private industry. 

   The ROK Government in close cooperation with industry and 
business organizations is preparing measures designed to reduce the 
impact on South Korea's economy of the Uruguay Round (UR) and 
similar international agreements that are expected to follow, 
according to recent Seoul press reports.  For example, on 19 April, 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) established a 
"Non-Official Committee for Developing Advanced Technology" headed 
by a Korea Institute of Science and Technology (KIST) professor in 
anticipation of the more stringent technology controls that advanced 
countries may place on technology as a result of the establishment 
of the World Trade Organization and the Technology Round, the 20 
April MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN said.  The committee reportedly "is to 
provide information which companies need to map long-term business 
strategies and increase the effectiveness of their investments." 
The newspaper noted that the "non-official" group's 28 members 
include officials from the Economic Planning Board, MOTIE, the 
Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST), "and other government 
agencies," as well as representatives from business, academia, 
research institutes, and economic organizations. 












?cI 

? 

   According to MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, at its first meeting, the 
committee set up a "comprehensive strategy" to develop nine 
technology fields--microelectronics, semiconductors, mechatronics, 
automobiles, aircraft, fiber optics, new materials, biotechnology, 
and "life industries."  By the end of the year, the committee will 
have chosen particular technologies to be developed jointly by 
government and business between 1995 and 2006.  The newspaper stated 
that "as a result of the UR agreement, changes in the way the ROK 
Government supports business will be required, causing a shift in 
the government's role to an indirect style of support by function." 
The committee therefore "will also propose plans to strengthen 
government's leadership function vis-a-vis the private sector," 
including a "plan to reshape the government support structure in a 
more effective direction." 

   In a related move, the 22 April MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported 
that the government formed a "Green Round Industrial Countermeasures 
Group" within MOTIE--another "non-official coalition" whose purpose 
is to "study South Korea's status with respect to issues discussed 
by the World Trade Organization's committees on trade and the 
environment" and to devise countermeasures by the end of June. 
According to the newspaper, the group is headed by MOTIE's 
Industrial Policy Bureau chief, and has representatives from nine 
government-affiliated or quasi-independent organizations, including 
the Industrial Advancement Administration, the Federation of Korean 
Industries, the Korea Employers Federation, the Korea Chamber of 
Commerce and Industry, the Korea Traders Association, the Korea 
Trade Promotion Corporation, the Korea Institute for Economics and 
Trade, the Energy Economics Research Institute, and the 
Manufacturing Technology Research Institute. 

   This group reportedly will focus on four areas: trade-related 
measures, measures related to the environment, procedures for 
solving disputes, and removal of trade restrictions.  These areas 
were distilled from what MOTIE believes will be the six topics 
discussed in the early stages of the Green Round:  (1) trade 
measures, such as import and export restrictions, enacted for 
environmental purposes, (2) environmental measures and policies, (3) 
transparency in trade and environment-related measures, (4) 
procedures for solving disputes on environmental issues with the 
World Trade Organization and other parties, (5) market access and 
elimination of trade restrictions, and (6) exporting products that 
are banned domestically. 
? 

   The 19 April MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN suggested that this "non- 
official" group may act as an instrument of government industrial 
"leadership" and as a conduit that gives firms input to government 
policy.  The newspaper named three economic organizations, all 
members of the government's Industrial Countermeasures Group, as 
involved in "working out plans for joint action and studying 
strategies of operation" in anticipation of the commercial issues 
that will be brought up by the World Trade Organization. 

   For example, the Federation of Korean Industries reportedly will 
host a three-day seminar to acquaint "top planning, production, and 
marketing executives" with the links between trade and environment 
expected to come out of the Green Round.  Issues to be raised at the 
seminar include environmental regulations of advanced countries, new 
financial strategies, "green management" and "green" marketing and 
production, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported.  The Korea Employers 
Federation, for its part, has set up a "Headquarters for 
Environmental Operations Measures, ' and will also inaugurate a 
"Blue 
Round Countermeasures Special Committee" composed of labor leaders 
from the 30 largest South Korean conglomerates.  The committee 
reportedly will work out joint steps to deal with international 
labor standards and practices, particularly those of the United 
States.  Finally, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that the Korea 
Traders Association will submit a list of policy recommendations to 
the government based on its own survey of the Green and Blue Rounds' 
likely effects. 

   FEATURE:  Hyundai Developing Rocket With Russian Technology -- 
SUMMARY:  Hyundai Group is downgrading the status of its venture 
with the Russian company Yakovlev and will concentrate its aerospace 
resources in a new subsidiary, Hyundai Technology Development 
Corporation, according to a Seoul newspaper.  Besides aircraft, the 
company will also develop a rocket large enough to orbit satellites. 

   According to the 9 May MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, South Korea's 
Hyundai Group has decided that its joint venture with the Russian 
aerospace firm Yakovlev, formed last November, will make it 
"difficult" for Hyundai to invest "full-scale" in the aviation 
industry.  Hyundai, therefore, will use the joint venture firm for 
sales only, while its new subsidiary, the Hyundai Technology 
Development Corporation, will serve as the group's designated 
aircraft manufacturer.  The latter is slated to take charge of the 
production of all rotary and fixed-wing aircraft, including assembly 
production of helicopters through a technology agreement with 
Japan's Kawasaki Heavy Industries and Hyundai's own effort to build 
mid-size aircraft.  "In the long term," MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
reported, the subsidiary will also be involved in aerospace 
development that will include the development of a "launch vehicle 
for earth satellites." 












jl 
? 

   MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN noted that Hyundai Technology Development 
was set up last February as a fully owned subsidiary of Hyundai 
Precision and Industry, with paid-up capital of 1.5 billion won 
($1.875 million).  The corporation reportedly has 180 employees, 120 
of whom are technical and research personnel.  A 27 April YONHAP 
dispatch added that Hyundai Technology Development Corp. owns 51 
percent of the joint venture Hyundai-Yak Aerospace Co. and Yakovlev 
the remainder. 

   According to the 5 November 1993 MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, the 
original agreement required Yakovlev to supply technology for 
aircraft design, development, and manufacturing, while Hyundai built 
the plant, paid "development" costs, and managed the operation.  The 
5 November 1993 CHUNGANG ILBO reported that the South Korean 
Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy was willing to allow the 
venture despite the complications another mid-size aircraft entrant 
would add to a crowded domestic field (see Pacific Rim Economic 
Review Vol 2 No 24, 1 Dec 93 pp 29-30) and contrary to its own 
industrial specialization policy. 

   FEATURE:  Samsung Introduces Third-Generation Electric Car -- 
SUMMARY:  Samsung has built a new electric car prototype which 
offers improved performance and many of the comforts available in 
standard automobiles, according to South Korean press reports.  The 
vehicle uses conventional storage batteries with an advanced motor 
and other innovations.  Within the next few years, several ROK 
manufacturers reportedly will offer practical electric cars based on 
high-tech batteries that have more power, greater range, and reduced 
charging time. 

   Samsung Heavy Industries recently unveiled the third in its 
series of increasingly sophisticated electric cars--the SEV III- 
-built by the company since June 1993, the 17 May MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN reported.  The newest version is a three-door hatchback with 
an aluminum frame and reinforced plastic body that uses regular 
storage batteries for a power source.  Its maximum output of 90 kw, 
equivalent to a 120 hp gasoline engine, was achieved by making 
major improvements" in the motor and controller, the newspaper 
stated. 

   The car uses a direct drive motor with no transmission, and is 
able to "absorb" the surplus energy created during braking.  Unlike 
most other electric vehicles, Samsung's car comes "fully loaded" 
with power steering and brakes, power windows, heater, and air 
conditioner.  The batteries are stored under the seats and in other 
unused areas to make space for a full complement of passengers. 
Performance and specifications were reported as follows. 
BOT 


           Top speed                     130 kph 
           Range                         180 km 
           Climbing ability              20 degrees 
           Capacity                      4 people 
           Gross Weight                  1,450 kg 
           Length                        3.95 meters 
           Width                         1.604 meters 
           Height                        1.385 meters 


EOT 

   By the end of the year, Samsung, "using its own technology," will 
have developed high-efficiency nickel-lead and "nickel-metal- 
hydrogen" batteries that will extend the car's range to 400 km, 
according to MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN.  A lithium battery-powered car is 
planned for the year 2000. 

   Samsung's electric car benefited from research which its 
subsidiary Samsung Electronics conducted as part of the government- 
backed HAN (Highly Advanced National) projects, according to the 1 
June CHUGAN MAEGYONG.  The ROK Government reportedly will spend 900 
billion won ($1.125 billion) to develop low-pollution vehicles, 
including electric cars, by 2001. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG stated that of all Korean manufacturers, Hyundai 
is the most advanced in electric cars.  The company has jointly 
developed with the U.S. firm Ovonics a high-tech nickel-metal- 
hydrogen battery-powered car with a top speed of 130 kph, a range of 
240 km, that can be recharged in three hours.  By 1996, Hyundai 
expects to produce an electric car that takes only 15 minutes to 
recharge, with a range of 350 km and a top speed of 160 kph. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG went on to report that Kia Motors exhibited 
electric vehicles at the Asian Games in 1986, at the Seoul Olympics 
in 1988, and again last year at the Taejon Expo.  Daewoo, another of 
South Korea's "big three" automakers, began developing an electric 
vehicle in February 1993 based on a van body and a 12 V 50 amp hr 
enclosed storage battery built by a German company, with a top speed 
of 141 kph and a range of 159 km.  The company plans to introduce a 
marketable car in 1997 developed jointly with Korea Delco Battery. 

   Iljin Advertisement Touts Group's Technological 'Achievements' -- 
The following is a translation of a full-page color advertisement 
that appeared on the back cover of the 11 May MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, 
the ROK's leading business newspaper. 













33 
? 

   (A large illustration at the top of the page portrays the word 
"Iljin" in steel block letters breaking through a stone wall 
engraved with the abbreviations NAFTA, GR, UR, TR, and EC.) 

   Overcoming the world's barriers through technology. 

   Technological Iljin, technological Korea. 

   A company which every year boldly invests in R and D at more than 
three times the rate of larger companies. 

   A company more than 90 percent of whose 400-plus products were 
developed with our technology and our personnel alone, including 
products which we were the first in South Korea to indigenize 
through our own technology teams, such as PCB electrolytic copper 
plating and industrial composite diamonds, for which South Korea had 
been entirely dependent on foreign countries' advanced technology. 

   (bold) Indigenizing state-of-the-art industries is Iljin's 
unchanging goal. 

   Our company Iljin, which is getting the world's attention for its 
very technology. 

   As a result of our efforts at developing new technology in 
various fields, Iljin has recently been experiencing astonishing 
growth in the most advanced areas as well, such as new materials, 
state-of-the-art data communications, and mechatronics, and is 
moving on with determination to make the dream of a technological 
Korea come true. 
? 

   ROK Government To Subsidize Engineering Technology -- Between 
1995 and 2005, the ROK Government will invest 481 billion won ($601 
million) in six "strategic" areas to help the country establish an 
independent base in engineering technology.  The government also 
intends to establish engineering research centers.  The program, 
based on a Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology study 
titled "An Evaluation of the Level of Engineering Technology and a 
Plan To Strengthen Technological Competitiveness," will go into 
effect in the first half of 1995.  The six areas are: (1) core 
processes and construction engineering technology, (2) basic plant 
design technology, (3) advanced production design, (4) computer 
integrated design and technical information systems, (5) technology 
for computer integrated projects, and (6) technology for plant 
packaging.  The Ministry of Science and Technology has organized an 
"Engineering Industry Policy Council" to coordinate engineering 
technology development between different agencies of government with 
responsibilities in the above areas.  As the ROK's engineering 
technology grows, the government hopes to expand the country's share 
of related technology and services from 1.1 percent of the world 
market ($600 million) to 8 percent ($7 billion).  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 9 May 94 p 14) 

   Daewoo Producing High-Tech Carbon Material for Aerospace -- 
Daewoo Heavy Industries has begun mass producing a high heat- 
resistant carbon composite material which it developed in 
cooperation with the National Defense and Science Institute.  This 
state-of-the-art material, the technology for which is strictly 
controlled by existing producers in the United States, England, and 
France, has applications in such items as aircraft brakes and 
nozzles for rockets.  Daewoo invested 8 billion won ($10 million) in 
research and development on the project.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 27 April 94 p 8) 

   Brazing Furnace, Other 'Dual-Use' Products Indigenized -- A 
continuous brazing furnace, so advanced that it has still not seen 
widespread use internationally, was "indigenized" by the South 
Korean firm Jinwon Machinery with support from the Korea Electric 
Power Corporation (KEPCO).  The project was part of a program funded 
by KEPCO to indigenize "electrical equipment" through a consortium 
of 13 companies that include Jinwon, Han-il Level Co., Iljin 
Electric and Machinery, and four private research labs.  Other new 
high-tech products developed through the program are the ROK's first 
standard system for controlling gas flow and a super-high voltage 
circuit breaker.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 9 May 94 p 10) 

















3J- 
? 

   ROK To Increase LNG Carrier Fleet to 10 Vessels by 2006 -- Korea 
Gas estimates domestic demand for liquified natural gas (LNG) will 
reach 4.72 million tons in 1994, 7.4 million tons in 1996, 8.28 
million tons in 1998, 9.57 million tons in 2000, and 104 million 
tons in 2006.  As the demand for LNG grows, South Korea will invest 
in the construction of its own flag LNG carriers in order to 
decrease its dependence on foreign LNG carriers and cut down on 
foreign exchange expenditures.  Korea Gas plans to expand its number 
of ROK LNG carriers to three in 1995, four in 1996, five in 1998, 
six in 2000, and 10 by 2006.  In contrast, the company will reduce 
its use of foreign carriers from three to two in 1995. 

   On 12 April, Hyundai Merchant Marine Company contracted with 
Indonesia to transport 1 million tons of LNG annually.  In June, the 
company will begin using ROK-flagged LNG carriers to transport LNG 
to South Korea.  Beginning next year, Yukong Shipping and Hyundai 
Merchant Marine will begin transporting LNG from Malaysia.  In 1996, 
Hanjin will begin bringing in supplies from Indonesia.  Korea Gas is 
in the process of arranging LNG shipments from Qatar beginning in 
1998 and plans to order four LNG carriers by the end of this year or 
in the first half of 1995.  (Seoul HANGUI? KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Apr 94 
                                        ? 
p 
8) 

   Halla Group, U.S. Firm To Build LNG Base in South Cholla -- Halla 
Group is cooperating with the U.S. firm Enron on plans to build a 
liquefied natural gas (LNG) base and an adjacent 900,000-kw thermal 
power plant in Masan-ri, Haenam County, South Cholla Province.  The 
LNG base will cover an area of about 300,000 pyong and have a 
processing capacity of 2 million tons annually.  Between now and 
1999, Halla Group will build three LNG storage tanks (each with a 
capacity of 125,000 square meters) and a 70,000-DWT (dead weight 
ton) class berth.  The LNG base will cover an area of about 300,000 
pyong and have a processing capacity of 2 million tons annually.  Of 
this, 1 million tons will be supplied as fuel to the power plant, 
while the remaining 1 million tons will be supplied as city gas to 
the Honam region.  The adjacent thermal power plant will be equipped 
with four 150,000-kw gas turbines and will sell its electricity to 
the Korea Electric Power Company.  As soon as Halla and the U.S. 
firm conclude their construction plans, they will submit a letter of 
intent to South Cholla Province.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 23 
Apr 94 p 10) 
? 

   Patent Office To Promote Environmental Technologies -- The Office 
of Patent Administration is setting up patent assistance measures to 
promote the development of environmental technologies.  It will use 
its initial review system flexibly in order to handle reviews of 
environmental technology applications first, so that the 
technologies can be commercialized sooner.  The patent office plans 
to work with the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy to set up a 
technology development fund and a commercialization fund for 
superior patents.  As the importance of environmental technologies 
has grown, the number of related patent and utility model 
applications for these technologies has increased--on average, by 
27.3 percent annually since 1988.  This compares to a 10-percent 
average annual increase in all patent and utility model applications 
during the same period. 


Patent/Utility Model Applications for Environmental Technologies 

                                                            Average 
Area              1988   1989   1990   1991   1992   1993  Annual 
                                                         Increase 

Water pollution   94     140    158    212    276    371   31.6 
Air pollution     109    123    158    146    216    286   21.3 
Waste management  13     31     52     86     94     154   64.0 
Noise/vibration   51     73     50     65     73      82   10.0 
Total             267    367    418    509    659    893   27.3 



(Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 3 May 94 p 13) 
? 

   Patent Office To Set up New Offices Promoting Inventions, Patents 
-- Next January the Office of Patent Administration will set up the 
Invention Promotion Association, which will take over the 
responsibilities of the existing Korea Invention and Patent 
Association.  The new association will be a "special non-profit 
corporation" and have the lead in promoting new inventions.  The 
patent office also intends to set up three organizations subordinate 
to the new association.  The Patent Technology Commercialization 
Center (a "patent real estate office") will be set up next January 
to handle the transfer or sale of patent rights, royalty fees, etc. 
The Industrial Technology Information Center will be set up in 
January 1996 to handle and supply patent information.  That same 
month the  Intellectual Property Rights Research Institute will be 
set up to develop plans to respond to developed nations' 
"aggression" on the intellectual property rights front.  By 1997 the 
new Invention Promotion Association, its three subordinate 
organizations, and other related organizations--such as the Korea 
Patent Attorney Association--will be housed under one roof.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 May 94 p 19) 

   Taerim Receives Order for Gas Processing Facilities From India -- 
Taerim Engineering has received an order from India's state-run ONGC 
Company to build natural gas processing facilities worth $72 million 
using the turnkey method.  This is reportedly an expansion project 
to build facilities to refine 20-41 million cubic meters of natural 
gas daily.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Jun 94 p 10) 

   POSCO Takes Over Japanese Steel Materials Plant -- For the first 
time, an ROK steel company, Pohang Iron and Steel Corporation 
(POSCO), has been selected in an auction to take over a Japanese 
plant, the Wakamatsu Plant of Fukuoka Steel Materials Industry Co in 
Kyushu, which went bankrupt in March.  The takeover bid amounts to 
1.156 billion yen ($10.86 million).  The annual production capacity 
of the plant is 13,000 metric tons.  POSCO will complete payment by 
August and will then engage in steel materials processing.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 May 94 p 8) 

   Hyundai Begins Pipeline Project in Vietnam -- Hyundai Heavy 
Industry Company has won a $55-million project to lay pipelines on 
the ground and in the sea in Vietnam.  Hyundai has begun laying a 
107 km-long pipeline between the natural gas exploratory platform in 
the White Tiger offshore oil field and will link this line with a 
17-km long ground pipeline to the Ba Ria combined thermoelectric 
power plant.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 May 94 p 8) 
?Development Bank Offers Loan to China To Build Thermal Power 

Plant -- The Korea Development Bank (KDB) announced on 27 May that 
it will offer a $9.5 million loan for the Chinese Government's 
construction of a thermoelectric power plant in Jiangsu Province as 
part of a total $470 million loan package to be offered to China. 
The other loan providers will be the International Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (IBRD), the J.P. Morgan Bank of the 
United States, the Dresner Bank of Germany, and the Tokyo Bank of 
Japan.  One bank official stated:  "This is the first time a ROK 
financing institution will provide a loan for a project the central 
government of China is pushing ahead."  The term of the loan from 
KDB will be 15 years, including a five-year grace period.  Repayment 
of the principal after 10 years will be guaranteed by IBRD.  KDB 
will officially conclude a loan contract with the Chinese Government 
in Beijing on 29 May.  (Seoul TONGA ILBO 28 May 94 p 11) 

   Gold Star Electric Cable Exports Combines to China -- At the end 
of 1992, Gold Star Electric Cable Company's heavy industry 
department concluded a technology tranfer contract for the 
production of farm implements with Siping Combine-Harvesters Plant 
in Jilin Province, China.  Under the contract, Gold Star recently 
exported 50 units of combine-harvesters worth about $500,000 to the 
plant.  This was the first shipment of a total volume of products 
worth $30 million that will be exported to China.  In addition, Gold 
Star will be paid $650,000 for the technology transfer.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 2 Jun 94 p 10) 

   Samsung To Participate in Russian Telecommunications Projects -- 
Samsung Electronics will participate in four major Russian 
telecommunications projects, including installation and management 
of a local telephone network in Moscow, construction of a long-range 
telecommunications network covering 50,000 km, modernization of a 
local network, and development of a satellite communications network 
in northern areas.  Samsung will have to invest at least $500 
million, which will make it the largest ROK investment in Russia. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Jun 94 p 9) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Coal Production Figures, Volume of 
Deposits Reported -- The president of the state-run coal company 
P.T. Bukit Asam recently stated that Indonesia has 36 billion tons 
in coal deposits, which would be sufficient to meet domestics needs 
for the next 300 years if consumption is controlled.  On the other 
hand, Indonesia is increasingly looking at coal as an export earner. 
Production has surged from 8.7 million tons in 1989 to 28 million 
tons currently.  Output is expected to reach 71 million tons in 
1999, of which 31.7 million will be earmarked for domestic use. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 10 May 94 p 5) 
? 

   MALAYSIA:  Leader Universal Holdings Begins PRC Joint Venture -- 
Malaysia's Leader Universal Holdings, whose subsidiaries engage 
mainly in production of telecommunications, power, and household 
cables, recently hosted a ground-breaking ceremony for its joint 
venture plant with the PRC's Huanan Communications Co. in the 
Shantou Special Economic Zone.  Called Xunda Electric Cable Co., the 
joint firm will produce communications cables of various types with 
an initial investment of $30 million, supported by the latest U.S. 
and European equipment.  Production is scheduled to begin in early 
1995 with an annual output of 700,000 to 1 million kilometers of 
cable.  Leader, with factories in Malaysia's northwest, Singapore, 
and the Philippines, controls 70 percent of Xunda's stock through 
its Hong Kong-based company.  (Petaling Jaya SIN CHEW JIT POH 7 May 
94 p 3) 

   Bank Consortium To Fund $1.2-Billion Sarawak LNG Project -- An 
international consortium of 37 banks, including 11 Japanese banks, 
signed an agreement on 2 June in Kuala Lumpur to finance a $1.187- 
billion liquified natural gas (LNG) plant expansion project in 
Sarawak, according to the 2 June NIi?EI KINYU SHIMBUN.  The national 
                                   ? 
project, which is being undertaken as a joint venture between 
Petronas, Malaysia's state-owned petroleum company, the Sarawak 
state government, Mitsubishi Corp., and Royal Dutch Shell, will make 
the Sarawak complex the largest LNG facility in Asia.  The target 
date for its completion is May 1996.  The 3 June NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN noted that the financing package is the "largest ever in 
Asia." 

   NIKi?I KINYU reported that the 11 Japanese banks, including the 
      ? 
Industrial Bank of Japan (IBJ), the Bank of Tokyo, and Mitsubishi 
Bank, will finance 37 percent of the total loan package.  The 
consortium selected six banks, headed by the IBJ and including the 
Bank of Tokyo, Mitsubishi Bank, Britain's Barclays Bank, and the 
American J.P. Morgan Bank, to be the "lead arrangers."  The nine- 
year financing package will be in two parts, an initial $410-million 
installment and a second $777-million installment. 

   Electricity Corporation Awards Contract to PRC Group -- The 
National Electricity Corporation has awarded a $37.5-million turnkey 
contract to the PRC's Xian Electric Group to supply and install 27- 
kilovolt (kv) gas-insulated switchgear (GIS) at two substations in 
Kuala Lumpur.  This is the third such contract awarded to the 
Chinese company.  The contract covers the design, manufacture, 
erection, and commissioning of more than 20 bays of the 275-kv GIS, 
six sets of 275/132-kv and 240 megavolt ampere transformers, 
ancillary equipment, and civil works for the Pudu Ulu and Galloway 
Road substations.  The substations are scheduled to be operational 
in March 1996.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS TIMES 21 May 94 p 14) 
?PHILIPPINES:  Manila To Get Telecommunications Tower -- A 

Department of Transportation and Communications official recently 
stated that the government plans to have a $250-million 
telecommunications tower built in Manila.  The 1,432-foot building, 
to be constructed under a build-operate-transfer scheme and 
scheduled for completion in 1998, will house television braodcast 
antennas, equipment for long-distance and cellular telephones, and 
airport radars.  The government has already received proposals from 
two companies--Australia's International Finance and Marketing 
Consultants, which has begun a feasibility study, and Japan's Mitsui 
and Co.  (BALITA 6 May 94 p 2) 

   THAILAND:  Japanese Firm Wins Natural Gas Separator Construction 
Contract -- Toyo Engineering, one of Japan's largest plant 
engineering firms, has been unofficially awarded a 2.4-billion baht 
($96-million) contract by the Petroleum Authority of Thailand, the 
state-owned oil company, to build a natural gas separator plant in 
central Thailand.  The plant, which will have a daily processing 
capacity of 350 million cubic feet, will be built in the Map Ta Phut 
District of Rayong Province.  Construction will begin later this 
year, after the contract is formally approved by the Thai Cabinet in 
June. The plant is scheduled to be completed in 1996. 

   The Petroleum Authority of Thailand already has two separator 
plants in Map Ta Phut District, but is building a third because of 
Thailand's rapidly increasing demand for energy.  (Tokyo NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 13) 

ROK, Japanese Firms To Build Steel Plant in Thailand 

   The South Korean Pohang Iron and Steel Corporation (POSCO), New 
Japan Steel, and Mitsui Products Company have agreed to participate 
in a project to produce grater in Thailand.  A total of 60 billion 
yen ($564 million) will be used to build the ROK-Japan joint steel 
plant.  Upon completion in  in 1997, the plant will be able to 
produce 800,000 to 1 million metric tons of grater annually.  (Seoul 
SEOUL SINMUN 5 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Japanese Firm Approved for Vehicle-Part Production -- The Board 
of Investment has approved Marujun Seiki Industry's proposal  to 
establish a $4-million vehicle-part venture in Saha Rattananakhon 
Industrial Estate.  The project is expected to be completed in June. 
According to Senior Managing Director Takashi Iwata, the Japanese 
company will own 60 percent of the venture, while Thai car firms, 
which cannot be named at this time, will own the remainder. 
(Bangkok BANGKOK POST 4 Jun 94 p 15) 
? 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investors Conferences, Foreign Investment 
Policies Reported -- SUMMARY:  The State Commission for Cooperation 
and Investment (SCCI) recently organized two conferences for 
Vietnamese investors to review and discuss foreign investment and 
cooperation efforts in the last six years.  A similar conference for 
foreign investors will be held in the near future. According to SRV 
press sources, the government will issue a series of "major 
policies" regarding foreign investment. 

   The 27 April Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported 
that the SCCI held two conferences in April for Vietnamese investors 
to review foreign investment in the last six years and identify 
problems that both the state and the investors need to solve 
"urgently."  The first conference was held on 8-9 April in Vinh City 
for the northern region, and the second on 12-13 April in Bien Hoa 
City for the southern region.  At the Vinh City conference, 
participants agreed to form a "Vietnamese Investors Club" where 
members could meet, exchange information, and help one another with 
business matters. 

   THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON observed that in order for Vietnam to 
attract $12-13 billion in investment until the year 2000, as called 
for by the national economic development strategy, changes must be 
made to improve the country's legal system, simplify administrative 
procedures, provide training for Vietnamese state and enterprise 
managers, and take care of problems relating to land use, labor, 
wages, and taxation.  According to the magazine, the SRV Government 
will issue a series of "major policies" to resolve "persistent 
problems" in foreign investment which have created "difficulties for 
all three participants:  foreign investors, Vietnamese investors, 
and government agencies."  The new policies will reportedly consist 
of the following: 

   1.  A comprehensive plan on investment in Vietnam for domestic 
investors and investors who have foreign partners.  The plan will 
specify priorities granted to various commercial and industrial 
sectors or national regions. 

   2.  An industrial/technological policy that sets guidelines and 
standards for machinery and equipment imports for joint enterprises, 
in order to avoid importing equipment that is too old, obsolete, 
overpriced, or unsuited to current conditions in the country. 

   3.  A real estate property policy based on the premise that 
foreign investors will not have to pay taxes on any land that they 
lease.  The Vietnamese investment partners will be responsible for 
compensating the previous occupants of the land and clearing the 
sites, while any funds expended by foreigners for site clearance 
will be considered part of their capital investment. 
? 

   4.  Policies on income tax, labor, salaries, technology transfer, 
and environmental protection will be formulated with a view to 
creating the best possible conditions for investors while fully 
"respecting the rights" of Vietnam. 

   The SCCI will coordinate with all ministries and agencies to 
simplify and speed up the issuance of investment licenses, according 
to THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON.  In addition, the license approval 
process will be codified, with specific guidance given for each 
industrial and commercial sector, so that any investor who submits 
the required paperwork will obtain a license without undue delays. 

   THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON stated that in the near future, the SCCI 
will organize a conference with major foreign investors to solicit 
comments, collect data, and prepare a program to "completely 
overhaul" Vietnam's investment structure in order to attract, 
increase, and speed up foreign investment in Vietnam in the years 
ahead.  This needs to be done to avert the threat of "economic 
backwardness," the magazine concluded. 

   Premier Issues Directive To Raise Revenues, Balance Budget -- On 
4 April, Prime Minister Vo Van Kiet issued Directive No 154/TTg 
tasking all cadres of concerned agencies to tackle "immediately" a 
number of urgent problems.  The directive is aimed at the "extremely 
critical problem of balancing the budget" at a time when too little 
revenue is being raised from the national economy, businesses suffer 
a "severe" lack of capital, and "waste, bribery, corruption, and 
smuggling" are rampant. 

   Under the directive, the Finance Ministry and the General 
Department of Customs must closely supervise the collection of all 
taxes and duties on production-oriented businesses, particularly 
those dealing with beer, alcoholic beverages, tobacco, cement, 
petroleum products, iron, and steel. 

   The Finance Ministry will immediately begin supervising the 
collection of revenues from land use fees, permits, and real estate 
transfers and sales involving state property.  The ministry will 
work with other ministries and provincial agencies to compile a 
report to the government on savings account deposits nationwide, 
with recommendations for managing these funds.  Together with the 
State Bank, the ministry will also immediately organize a treasury 
bond market and explore other means of raising funds.  (Ho Chi Minh 
City SAIGON GIAI PHONG 9 April 94 p 1) 
? 

   Thanh Hoa, Taiwanese Companies Form Joint Venture -- The Vietnam 
Sugarcane Company, under the Ministry of?Agriculture and Food 
                                       ? 
Industry, and four Taiwanese companies--including Tai Tung and Fu 
Mei--have formed a joint venture to build a sugar plant in Thanh 
Hoa, with a processing capacity of 6,000 metric tons of sugar cane a 
day.  Investment capital in the venture amounts to $66 million, of 
which $26.4 million is prescribed capital, with the Taiwanese 
partners contributing 75 percent of the total.  Upon completion, the 
plant will produce approximately 100,000 metric tons of sugar a 
year.  (Ho Chi Minh City SAIGON GIAI PHONG 11 April 94 p 2) 

   Japanese Banks Trailing Others in Vietnam Investment -- Foreign 
banks are beginning to establish branches elsewhere in Vietnam 
besides Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  For example, Malaysia's joint 
venture bank VID Paburik Bank, established in 1992 with branches in 
the country's two main cities, became the first foreign bank to 
locate a branch in the central city of Da Nang.  Indovina, a joint 
venture with Indonesia, will soon open its third branch in Haiphong. 
Other Asian and European banks are preparing to establish branches 
or offices in both Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  By contrast, 
Japanese banks have been more cautious, limiting their involvement 
to Ho Chi Minh City; they do not expect to be represented in both 
Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City for another two or three years.  (Tokyo 
NIKi?I KIN1?AI? SHIMBUN 20 May 94 p 2) 
   ?      ?  ? 

   Mitsui Importing LPG, Ammonia to Vietnam -- Mitsui and Co. and 
Thailand's Unique Gas will form a joint venture in July called 
U.G.P. to import liquified petroleum gas (LPG) and ammonia into 
Vietnam for local sale.  Its $2-million initial capital is being 
shared 50-50.  Plans are to buy the LPG and ammonia from Indonesia 
and store it in 2,000-ton high-pressure tanks at the Go Rau 
industrial zone outside Ho Chi Minh City.  Initially most customers 
will be Vietnamese manufacturers of foodstuffs, fertilizer, and 
ceramics located in the industrial zone.  Later sales will include 
domestic energy.  This is the first 100-percent foreign investment 
allowed by the SRV Government in which a large Japanese company is 
participating.  Since it "takes time" to arrange a joint venture 
with a domestic Vietnamese company, Mitsui decided to use foreign 
capital to speed up the operation.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 31 
May 94 p 13) 
? 

   Australian, U.S. Firms Plan Power Plant-Factory Complex -- The 
Australian resource development company BHP and the United States' 
General Electric Co. plan to build an electric power station and 
fertilizer factory in Vietnam at a cost of $810 million.  According 
to BHP, which is at the "center" of the project, a natural gas- 
fueled power generating station will be built in the Ba Ria-Vung Tau 
region 65 km southeast of Ho Chi Minh City and a fertilizer factory 
with an annual output of 600,000 tons will be built next to it. 
Although still in the blueprint stage, BHP would use the natural gas 
generated as a byproduct of its oil production at the Dai Hung 
offshore oil fields to fuel the plant as early as October.  GE will 
supply the gas turbines.  BHP is also considering building a 
petrochemical plant in Vietnam.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 3 Jun 
94 p 12) 

   Joint Venture Firm Plans To Install 200,000 Telephone Circuits -- 
The Bakrie Group, one of Indonesia's largest conglomerates, together 
with the U.S. Hughes Corp. and Dac Tho Viet, a state-owned 
commercial company, have signed an agreement to establish a joint 
venture company to install a telephone network with 200,000 
circuits.  Total investment in the project will be "about $700 
million." 

   According to Aburizal Bakrie, president of the Bakrie Group and 
chairman of the Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industry, the 
investment ratios in the joint venture have not yet been decided, 
but it is planned that the Bakrie Group and Hughes will hold an 80- 
percent stake and the Vietnamese company the remainder.  Given 
Vietnam's "infrastructural shortcomings," the new company hopes its 
investment plans will receive quick approval. 

   Indonesian private investment in Vietnam has increased recently 
as a result of the April 1994 visit to Indonesia by Vietnamese 
Foreign Minister Nguyen Manh Cam.  Eleven Indonesian companies have 
signed agreements to invest a total of $160 million in projects 
involving Vietnam's petroleum sector, natural gas exploration, coal, 
hotels, timber processing, and others.  The 11 projects have already 
received approval from the Vietnamese Government.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 19 May 94 p 3) 
? 

   Northern Telecom To Provide Telephone Equipment -- Northern 
Telecom has signed a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with 
Vietnam's Department of Post and Telecommunications to supply 
switching equipment for a 1 million-line telephone project.  Some 
100,000 lines will be delivered this year.  The contract, valued at 
$6.1 million, will involve supplying DMS-100 switching equipment to 
Haiphong.  A second MOU for the manufacture of switches has been 
signed.  In this instance, Northern Telecom will have to identify 
the yearly production quantity and the percentages earmarked for 
domestic and export markets.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 27 May 94 p 21) 

   Export-Import Value Rises to $3.3 Billion -- Vietnam's export- 
import value so far this year has reached $3.3 billion--with half of 
this amount coming from exports--an increase of 27 percent compared 
to the same period last year.  The import value has increased by 32 
percent.  Most of the increase in exports has come from coffee, 
peanuts, rubber, processed marine products, textiles and garments. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 31 May 94) 

   Authorities Withdraw 131 Investment Licenses -- The State 
Committee for Cooperation and Investment has withdrawn the licenses 
for 131 projects, leaving 773 valued at $7 billion.  In April alone, 
100 more licenses capitalized at $1.2 billion were granted.  This 
equals 40 percent of the total capital received in all of last year. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 1 Jun 94) 

   Construction Boom Keeps Demand, Price of Cement High -- Demand 
for cement has been on the rise since mid-1993 due to a construction 
boom in cities such as Hanoi, Ho Chi Minh City, and Haiphong. 
Prices have gone up between 10 and 45 percent.  The Vietnamese 
Cement Corporation predicts that this year's demand will be about 
6.5 million tons, 8 million tons in 1996, 10 to 12 million tons in 
1997, and 20 million tons in the year 2000.  Nguyen Van Thien, 
general director of the Vietnamese Cement Corporation, recently said 
that domestic producers are unable to meet the demand for cement. 
(Hanoi VNA 0610 GMT 5 Jun 94) 

   Hanoi Issues New Treasury Bills, Bonds -- The Ministry of Finance 
recently announced it will issue six-month treasury bills at 1.7- 
percent monthly interest starting on 1 June.  Treasury bonds with a 
two-year maturity period will also be offered beginning 20 June in 
30 cities and provinces.  Treasury bills, with a minimum value of 
$9.25 each, can be paid in either Vietnamese dong, gold, or U.S. 
dollars.  Treasury bills are registered, while treasury bonds are 
not.  They can be traded, transferred, or mortgaged, but they cannot 
be used to replace banknotes or for the payment of taxes.  All 
income from treasury bills and bonds are tax exempted.  (Hanoi Voice 
of Vietnam 1000 GMT 2 Jun 94) 

EAG/15Jun94/ECONF/TECHTF/East Asia Group 
? 

